California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1274.)
-------------------------------------------

491.3.

The department may impose such limitations, restrictions, and conditions upon or in connection with the benefits conferred pursuant to the California National Guard Members’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1978 (Article 4 (commencing with Section 270) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2), purchase contracts entered into pursuant to that act and this chapter, and revenue bonds issued pursuant to this chapter as may be necessary in the judgment of the department in order to better assure or preserve the exemption of interest on the bonds from federal income taxation, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in that act or this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 920, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. CALIFORNIA CADET CORPS AND VOLUNTARY ORGANIZATIONS [500. - 567.]



  CHAPTER 1. California Cadet Corps [500. - 522.]

500.

(a) The students of a school, college, or community college in this state may be organized into an appropriately sized California Cadet Corps unit under the rules and regulations prescribed by the governing body of the school, college, or community college where the unit is formed and the Adjutant General.

(b) A school, college, or community college is not required to establish a California Cadet Corps unit unless the number of qualified students who voluntarily enroll in the unit is sufficient to meet the strength prescribed by the Adjutant General.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 2.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

500.1.

(a) A California Cadet Corps unit may not be established at a school, college, or community college in this state in which there is an established J.R.O.T.C. or R.O.T.C. program unless it is approved, in writing, by the school or the governing board of the sponsoring organization.

(b) J.R.O.T.C., R.O.T.C., and other federally approved military units are not subject to, or limited by, this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 4.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

500.2.

(a) An independent California Cadet Corps unit may be established outside of the authority of a school, college, or community college. These units may be established at a State Guard facility, a federal, state, or local government-owned or government-operated facility, a veteran or service organization location, or another public location approved by the Adjutant General.

(b) The Adjutant General may enter into a memorandum of understanding with a sponsoring organization that describes the requirements and expectations of establishing a California Cadet Corps unit under its auspices.

(c) If the Adjutant General enters into the memorandum of understanding authorized in subdivision
 (b), the memorandum shall include, but not be limited to, information regarding all of the following:

(1) Compliance with the California Cadet Corps regulations and policies.

(2) Reporting of enrollment and activities.

(3) The provision of an area for California Cadet Corps instruction.

(4) The provision of a secure area for property issued by the California Cadet Corps.

(5) Ensuring adequate and appropriate adult supervision of cadets.

(6) The facilitation of California Cadet Corps instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 5.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

(a) While a school, college, or community college is in session, school-based California Cadet Corps units shall be under the guidance and control of the principal, president, director, or chief administrative officer of the
 school, college, or community college who shall be responsible for making
 regulations with the approval of the Adjutant General regarding the moral, educational, and physical welfare of the cadets.

(b) An independent California Cadet Corps unit shall be under the guidance and control of the head of the sponsoring organization, who shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with California Cadet Corps regulations, securing and maintaining California Cadet Corps-issued state property, and following the established curricula of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 6.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

502.

(a) Upon recommendation of the governing board having jurisdiction over the school, college, community college, or sponsoring organization, the Adjutant General may appoint officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers in the California Cadet Corps for duty as commandants of cadets or assistant commandants of cadets in each school, college, community college, or sponsoring organization under the jurisdiction of the governing board.

(b) Except when ordered to state active duty by the Governor, the officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers shall be under the immediate control and jurisdiction of the governing board of the school, college, or community college at which they are on duty and pay, allowances, and expenses shall be disbursed from
 funds appropriated for the maintenance and operations of the school, college, or community college where they serve.

(c) Each officer, warrant officer, and noncommissioned officer shall hold their appointment at the pleasure of the governing board until a successor has been appointed and qualified or until their affiliation with the California Cadet Corps is severed.

(d) (1) The Adjutant General may appoint commissioned officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers as staff officers in support of California Cadet Corps operations.

(2) A staff officer not assigned to a school, college, or community college is under the immediate control and jurisdiction of the Commander of the California Cadet Corps.

(3) An officer,
 warrant officer, or noncommissioned officer on state active duty in support of the California Cadet Corps is under the immediate control and jurisdiction of the Commander of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 138.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

502.1.

(a) The Adjutant General shall determine by the adoption of rules and regulations the grade and rank to be held by individuals appointed in the California Cadet Corps by reason of their military experience, professional knowledge, or both. These individuals shall be appointed pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted by the Adjutant General.

(b) (1) A person who has previously been an officer, warrant officer, or noncommissioned officer of, and discharged under honorable conditions from, the United States Army, the United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United States Marine Corps, the United States Space Force, the United States Coast Guard, a reserve component of those federal forces, the California National Guard, the State
 Guard, or the active militia may be appointed in the California Cadet Corps in the same rank last held in federal or state military forces.

(2) Each officer, warrant officer, or noncommissioned officer shall hold office pursuant to the rules and regulations adopted by the Adjutant General.

(3) (A) Upon recommendation of the Adjutant General, the Governor may commission one Commander of the California Cadet Corps as a brigadier general or colonel, up to two Deputy Commanders of the California Cadet Corps as a colonel or lieutenant colonel, one Chief of Staff as a colonel or lieutenant colonel, and the necessary number of staff and regional advisors in the same grade and rank last held in federal or state military forces, not to exceed lieutenant colonel, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the Adjutant General.

(B) The Commander of the California Cadet Corps may be appointed to a brigadier general, and the Deputy Commanders may be appointed as a colonel, once the total number of enrolled cadets exceeds 10,000 annually or there are more than 100 California Cadet Corps units.

(4) Upon the recommendation of the Adjutant General, the Governor may appoint commissioned officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers to the same grade and rank last held in federal or state military forces for service in the California Cadet Corps by virtue of their professional knowledge and experience. Pay and expenses shall be taken from the funds appropriated for the maintenance and support of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 139.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

502.2.

(a) All personnel appointed in the California Cadet Corps pursuant to Section 502.1 shall wear uniforms prescribed by the Adjutant General. Primary uniforms shall be consistent with uniforms of the State Guard with distinctive California Cadet Corps markings.

(b) Personnel wearing the uniforms described in subdivision (a) shall meet appearance standards consistent with the State Guard.

(c) Personnel not meeting the standards described in this section may wear an alternate uniform approved by the Commander of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 140.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

502.3.

The Adjutant General may adopt rules and regulations providing for the personnel actions of officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 11.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

502.4.

(a) The Adjutant General may order officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers in the California Cadet Corps to state active duty at encampments, exercises, or other activities conducted by the corps.

(b) While on state active duty, an officer, warrant officer, and noncommissioned officer shall receive the same base pay, without longevity, as a member of similar grade in the United States Army together with their expenses.

(c) Pay and expenses for these purposes shall be paid from funds appropriated for the maintenance and support of the California Cadet Corps.

(d) When on state active duty in support of the California Cadet
 Corps, personnel are under the direction and control of the Commander of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 141.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

503.

(a) California Cadet Corps units shall be organized and each shall consist of commissioned cadet officers, cadet warrant officers, and noncommissioned cadet officers as shall be prescribed by the Adjutant
 General.

(b) Cadet officers shall be commissioned in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the Adjutant General and upon recommendation of the commandant and with the approval of the respective principal or brigade advisor.

(c) The warrant and noncommissioned cadet officers shall be appointed by the commandant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 14.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

504.

(a) The Adjutant General shall adopt rules and regulations for the formation of cadet brigades, regiments, and battalions and shall adopt tables of organization and provide for the appointment of cadet brigade, regimental, and battalion officers and staff.

(b) All cadet battalion officers, regimental, and noncommissioned officers shall be appointed, commissioned, or warranted in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the Adjutant General and upon the recommendation of the commandant of cadets with the approval of the president, director, chief administrative officer, or principal of the school, college, community college, or, in the case of an independent unit not based at a school or college, the head of the sponsoring
 organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 142.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

505.

The Adjutant General may order officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers of the State Guard, Naval Militia, or California National Guard to temporary state active duty to perform functions in support of the California Cadet Corps. Pay for those duties shall be disbursed from funds appropriated for the support and maintenance of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 143.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

506.

All cadet officers, cadet warrant officers, and cadet noncommissioned officers shall be promoted according to rules and regulations adopted by the Adjutant General upon the recommendation of the commandant of cadets and with the approval of the president, director, chief administrative officer, or principal of the school, college, community college, or, in the case of an independent unit not based at a school or college, the head of the sponsoring organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 17.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

507.

(a) Upon the recommendation of the president, director, chief administrative officer, or principal of the school, college, or community college in which the California Cadet Corps participates, the commission or warrant of a
 cadet commissioned officer, cadet warrant officer, or cadet noncommissioned officer may be
 canceled and the cadet reduced in rank or dismissed from the California Cadet Corps for any of the following reasons:

(1) Deficiency in academic studies.

(2) Misbehavior in the school, college, or community college the cadet is attending.

(3) Misbehavior in the California Cadet Corps.

(4) For any other reason deemed good cause by the president, director, chief administrative officer, or principal of the school, college, or community college.

(b) For an independent unit, the brigade advisor and head of the sponsoring organization shall be the disciplinary authority.

(c) The Commander of the California Cadet Corps may independently, or in coordination with the school or sponsoring
 organization official, demote or dismiss a cadet from the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 18.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

508.

The California Cadet Corps shall train in accordance with the appropriate manuals prescribed by the United States Army and by the rules and regulations adopted by the Adjutant General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 19.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

509.

The Adjutant General shall provide suitable training regulations, books and courses of instruction, and the necessary forms for reports or other necessary purposes to be used by the California Cadet Corps. The Adjutant General may take such action as is necessary to promote the general welfare, strength, and morale of the California Cadet Corps and to provide for the recreation of cadets.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 630, Sec. 16.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

510.

(a) The Adjutant General shall prescribe the uniforms that the cadet and adult members of the California Cadet Corps shall wear.

(b) (1) The Adjutant General may issue, to the California Cadet Corps cadets and adults, necessary training aids, insignia of rank and of the California Cadet Corps, awards and decorations, and military property or equipment in the control of the Adjutant General as may not be required for the California National Guard, other state military forces, or other military purposes.

(2) The issues described in paragraph (1) may be made by the Adjutant General without charge to the members of the California Cadet Corps or to the school, college, community college,
 or sponsoring organization.

(3) The Adjutant General, after receiving written acknowledgment from the president, director, chief administrative officer, or principal of the school, college, community college, or sponsoring organization of the receipt of the issues described in paragraph (1), shall account the same as a transfer of equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 144.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

511.

A sufficient number of rifles suitable for drill or marksmanship purposes, or both may be purchased by the board of school trustees, board of education, board of directors or trustees of a college or community college, county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or the Adjutant General out of any funds available and not otherwise appropriated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 630, Sec. 18.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

511.5.

Under rules and regulations adopted by the Adjutant General, the Adjutant General may purchase uniforms, insignia, and awards and decorations for the cadet and adult members of the California Cadet Corps, including utility, physical training, dress, and formal uniforms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 21.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

512.

(a) Marksmanship practice may constitute a part of the instruction to be given to cadets.

(b) A member of the California Cadet Corps may engage in rifle matches and competitions conducted or held in this state or at any place in the United States.

(c) (1) The Adjutant General may purchase and supply a sufficient number of efficient rifles for field target work and gallery practice and the ammunition and equipment necessary for efficient rifle
 practice to each California Cadet Corps unit.

(2) A sufficient number of rifles suitable for field target work or gallery target firing and the ammunition and equipment may be purchased by a board of school trustees, board of education, board of directors or trustees of a college or community college, county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or the head of a sponsoring organization
 out of
 funds available, and the governing body or governing officials of a school, college, community college, or sponsoring organization may purchase the necessary parts for and may repair any rifles acquired or furnished to the California Cadet Corps.

(d) All
 marksmanship practice shall be under the supervision of the president, chief administrative officer, director, or principal of the school, college, community college, or sponsoring organization or under the supervision of an appointed officer or officers.

(e) (1) A competent member of the California
 National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia may be detailed by the Adjutant General, with their consent, and upon request of the president, director, chief administrative officer, or principal of the school, college, community college, or sponsoring organization as an instructor of marksmanship practice in the California Cadet Corps.

(2) An instructor from the California National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia on duty at a school, college, community college, or sponsoring organization for marksmanship practice shall be under the immediate control and jurisdiction of the governing body of the school, college, community college, or sponsoring organization.

(f) The expenditures may be paid out of funds appropriated for the maintenance and support of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 22.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

513.

(a) The Adjutant General may detail, from the organizations of the California National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia, competent members who shall perform duties on behalf of the California Cadet Corps and who may act as military training instructors for the California Cadet Corps.

(b) The Adjutant General may provide compensation for a person detailed for duty and service with the California Cadet Corps.

(c) The expenditures may be paid out of funds appropriated for the maintenance and support of the California Cadet Corps.

(d) The Adjutant General may conduct conferences and other events and activities for members of the California
 Cadet Corps and may utilize funds appropriated for the maintenance and support of the California Cadet Corps for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 145.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

514.

When practical, members of the California Cadet Corps shall, under the supervision of a qualified California Cadet Corps instructor, be permitted to utilize California National Guard
 ranges, including marksmanship ranges, for cadet training when the ranges are not being used by the California National Guard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 24.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

515.

(a) A California Cadet Corps unit in its first year of operation shall receive an assistance visit to ensure assigned personnel receive the training and support needed to adequately prepare for their first formal, for-record inspection. The
 commander, deputy commanders, or regional advisors or military officers of the California National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia detailed by the Adjutant General shall inspect units of the California Cadet Corps at least once every three years and annually for a unit that received
 a rating of unsatisfactory in the prior year’s inspection.

(b) (1) An inspector shall report to the Adjutant General regarding unit community and school service activities, discipline, cadet leadership, training, military knowledge and instruction, and administrative compliance to include condition of property of the California Cadet Corps.

(2) For a unit at a school, college, or community college, a report described in paragraph (1) shall be made and forwarded in
 duplicate, one copy to the Superintendent of Public Instruction and one copy to the Adjutant General’s office, shall bear the endorsement of the president, director, chief administrative officer, or college, community college, or principal of the school, college, or community college, and shall contain remarks the officials may deem pertinent.

(3) For a unit at a sponsoring organization, a report described in paragraph (1) shall be made and forwarded to the Adjutant General’s office, shall bear the endorsement of the president, director, or
 chief administrative officer of the sponsoring organization, and shall contain remarks the officials may deem pertinent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 25.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

516.

(a) The president, director, chief administrative officer, or principal of a school, college, or community college shall be responsible for all public property supplied to a California Cadet Corps
 unit under their control or supervision and shall ensure the property and equipment is properly secured and cared for.

(b) For an independent unit not based at a school or college, the head of the sponsoring organization shall be responsible for state property pursuant to the memorandum of understanding described in Section 500.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 26.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

517.

(a) An encampment may be held by the California Cadet Corps for a duration, and attended by a proportion of the strength of the corps, as may be prescribed by the Adjutant General.

(b) The expenses of encampments may be paid out of funds appropriated for the maintenance and support of the California Cadet Corps.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 29.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

518.

If a California Cadet Corps unit is established through the execution of a memorandum of understanding with the respective governing board, pursuant to Section 500.2, the board of school trustees, president, director, and chief administrative officer of a college or community college, board of trustees of a college or community college, board of education, principal or director of a high school, county superintendent of schools, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and, for an independent unit not based at a school or college, the head of a sponsoring organization shall cooperate with the Adjutant General in the management and administration of the California Cadet Corps unit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 31.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

519.

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all community colleges in this state, and the principals and governing boards of community colleges shall have the same authority as similar officials of schools.

(b) If a community college is located in close proximity to a school that has a California Cadet Corps unit, the governing boards of the community college and school may enter into an agreement to provide for the joint organization of cadet units.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 33.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

520.

(a) (1) A commander, deputy commander, regional advisor, officer, warrant officer, or noncommissioned officer appointed or detailed pursuant to Section 502, 502.1, 512, 513, or 515 who is wounded, injured, disabled, or killed in the performance of ordered duty is entitled to receive compensation from the state in accordance with the provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code.

(2) In the circumstances described in paragraph (1), the individual shall be deemed to be an employee of the state.

(3) The compensation for the individual shall be ascertained, determined, and fixed upon the basis of their average income from all sources during the year
 immediately preceding the date of the injury or death, or the commencement of the disability, but the compensation shall not exceed the maximum prescribed in Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code.

(b) In determining the benefits awarded to an individual under the provisions of this section, it shall be conclusively presumed that the average yearly earning of the injured or deceased individual is not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). An injury, death, or disability shall be deemed to have been suffered in the line of duty unless the injury, death, or disability resulted from misconduct or disobedience of lawful orders by the injured or deceased individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 146.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

520.1.

(a) The principal and governing board of a private educational institution, charter school, or military academy in which a J.R.O.T.C. or R.O.T.C. unit is not maintained, but which otherwise meets the qualifications prescribed by
 this chapter and any rules and regulations that may be adopted by the Adjutant General, may apply to the Adjutant General for permission to establish a California Cadet Corps unit, battalion, or regiment pursuant to this chapter.

(b) If the Adjutant General approves the petition, the principal and
 governing board of the private school shall have the same authority as a similar official of a school, college, or community college to create a unit of, and to become a member of, the California Cadet Corps.

(c) A California Cadet Corps unit formed under this section shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter as though it were a school, college, or community college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 35.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

522.

(a) The Adjutant General may enter into a cooperative agreement with a nonprofit public benefit education corporation if the corporation’s articles of incorporation and bylaws expressly support the goals of the California Cadet Corps and the net earnings or assets of the corporation shall inure to the benefit of the California Cadet Corps.

(b) A California Cadet Corps adult member may serve as a board member of a corporation described in subdivision (a) provided the corporation has an approved cooperative agreement with the department.

(c) The Adjutant General may establish regulations regarding subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) A cooperative agreement described in subdivision (a) shall define the requirements, authorizations, and restrictions of the nonprofit corporation to solicit grants and other funding, including private donations, on behalf of a California Cadet Corps unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 207, Sec. 36.   (SB 1335)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Military Academies [530. - 532.]

530.

In any military academy, having not less than 80 students, uniformed, drilled, and instructed in strict accordance with the tactics of the regular United States Army, and in which the instruction is conducted in accordance with military principles, the military instructor or instructors or professors of military science and tactics of the academy regularly elected or appointed by the board of trustees or other lawful authority of the academy, may be commissioned in the California Cadet Corps with the rank of major or lower rank. Such officers shall not
 exercise authority or command except as military instructor or instructors or professors of military science and tactics of such academy. The commissions shall be granted and may be revoked by the Adjutant General, under such rules and regulations as they may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 54.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

531.

The Adjutant General may enter into a cooperative agreement with the Oakland Military Institute College Preparatory Academy, a California charter school, to provide a structured, disciplined environment emphasizing academic
 skills, leadership, camaraderie, and a strong sense of community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 35.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

532.

(a) (1) Subject to subdivision (b), the Adjutant General may enter into a cooperative agreement with the governing board of a school district or a county office of education for the purpose of establishing, pursuant to existing statutory authority in the Education Code, a military academy to be operated as a charter school, pursuant to Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, or as one of the existing alternative education options, available under the Education Code. The program would provide a structured, disciplined environment that would be conducive to learning in a college preparatory environment. In addition to academic skills, students would develop leadership, self-esteem, and a strong sense of community. An academy established pursuant to this section
 shall comply with the Education Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section 509 of Title 32 of the United States Code and subject to subdivision (b), the Adjutant General shall conduct a civilian youth opportunities program, to be known as the “National Guard Youth ChalleNGe Program,” which shall consist of at least a 22-week residential program and a 12-month post-residential mentoring period. The program shall serve at-risk teens in areas of the state, including, but not limited to, the San Joaquin Valley, western Riverside County, and northern California, and
 shall be subject to all of the following:

(A) The program shall seek to improve life skills and employment potential of participants by providing military-based leadership development, promoting fellowship and community service, developing life-coping skills and job skills, improving physical fitness, providing health and hygiene training, and assisting participants to receive a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(B) (i) The Adjutant General may accept federal funding to implement a National Guard Youth ChalleNGe Program. The Adjutant General may appoint a director and other service members and employees, permanent or temporary, to operate the program.

(ii) The Adjutant General may appoint a current member of the State Guard who possesses a bachelor’s degree in psychology or social work to
 serve as a counselor within the program.

(C) The Military Department shall enter into a memorandum of agreement with an appropriate school district or a county office of education for the purpose of providing educational services for students enrolled in a National Guard Youth ChalleNGe Program. The school district or county office of education with which the department contracts shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with any applicable requirements imposed by the Education Code.

(b) A new program, except for the California Cadet Corps, may only be established as provided in subdivision (a) if funds are appropriated for purposes of the program in the annual Budget Act or any other act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 703, Sec. 1.   (SB 228)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. State Military Reserve Act [550. - 567.]

550.

Whenever any part of the National Guard of this state is in active federal service, or when Congress consents thereto, the Governor may organize and maintain within this state during that period, under regulations the Secretary of Defense of the United States may prescribe for discipline in training, the military forces the Governor deems necessary to defend and for the security of this state; provided, however, the Governor may authorize the organization and maintenance of these forces at cadre strength at any time. These forces shall be composed of officers commissioned or assigned, and the qualified citizens or persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States who have declared their intentions to become citizens and who volunteer for service, supplemented,
 if necessary, by members of the unorganized militia enrolled by draft or otherwise as provided by law. These forces shall be additional to and distinct from the National Guard and shall be known as the State Guard. These forces shall be uniformed under the conditions and subject to the regulations as the Governor may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 41.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

551.

The Governor is hereby authorized to prescribe rules and regulations not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter governing the enlistment, organization, administration, equipment, maintenance, training, and discipline of forces. The rules and regulations, insofar as the Governor deems practicable and desirable, shall conform to existing law governing and pertaining to the National Guard and the rules and regulations adopted thereunder and shall prohibit the acceptance of gifts, donations, gratuities, or anything of value by those forces or any member of those forces from any individual, firm, association, or corporation by reason of that membership. Former Section 167 shall at no time apply to the
 forces herein authorized except that all officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons on active duty with the Office of the Adjutant General shall be appointed by the Governor, with consideration of the recommendation of the Adjutant General. All officers, warrant officers and enlisted persons on active duty under former Section 167 who are ordered into federal service by federal authority during the emergency or who are ordered by state authority to perform duty with the forces herein authorized shall not thereby lose the rights and privileges provided in former Section 167 and shall be restored to those rights and privileges upon completion of that service or duty.

Members of the California National Guard not ordered to federal service or who are not required to perform federal service or who have been deferred from federal duty may perform service as members
 of the California National Guard on state active duty on behalf of the forces herein authorized and may be compensated as provided in Sections 320 and 321.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 43.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

552.

(a) Officers and warrant officers of the forces herein authorized on active duty in the service of the state shall receive the same pay and allowances as officers of similar grade in the Army of the United States.

(b) An officer, warrant officer or enlisted person of the forces herein authorized may, with their consent, be detailed for duty and may be paid compensation in any grade lower than the officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person actually holds; provided, the officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person voluntarily waives all compensation in excess of the lower grade in which they are detailed to duty.

(c) When an officer or warrant officer of the forces herein authorized is detailed for
 special duty in any matter relating to those forces, by order of the Governor, they shall be allowed the same pay and allowances as officers or warrant officers of similar grade in the Army of the United States and actual traveling expenses. An enlisted person similarly detailed shall be allowed the same pay and allowances as enlisted persons of similar grade in the Army of the United States and actual traveling expenses, except that family allowances shall not be allowed those enlisted persons. An officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person of the forces herein authorized may, with their consent, be detailed for special duty without expense to the state, except and provided, however, they may be paid their actual traveling expenses.

(d) In addition to the pay and allowances authorized in this code, personnel of the forces created herein having administrative functions connected therewith may be paid not more than twenty dollars ($20) per
 month for the performance of those duties according to rules and regulations adopted by the Adjutant General.

(e) All enlistments of members of the active militia may be extended by the Adjutant General if necessary during the existence of a national emergency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 147.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

553.

Enlisted persons of the forces herein authorized on active duty in the service of the State shall receive the same pay and allowances, except family allowances, as enlisted persons of similar grade in the Army of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1950, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

554.
